New York, session 2025-2026, S3851.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3121 of the public health law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 6 to read as follows: 3 6. (a) The council shall review all current medical research and guid- 4 ance regarding the donation of blood by patients with a history of Lyme 5 or tick-borne illnesses, including but not limited to: 6 (i) human anaplasmosis; 7 (ii) babesiosis; 8 (iii) human ehrlichiosis; 9 (iv) Rocky Mountain spotted fever; 10 (v) Powassan virus; 11 (vi) Southern tick-associated rash illness; and 12 (vii) other related illnesses and co-infections. 13 (b) (i) The council shall, within ninety days after the effective date 14 of this subdivision, issue recommendations to the commissioner regarding 15 the collection, testing, and distribution of blood donations with Lyme 16 and tick-borne illnesses present or reported in a patient history, 17 including but not limited to: 18 (1) considerations of the current state of medical research; and 19 (2) recommendations for temporary or permanent moratoriums on the 20 collection of blood with Lyme and tick-borne related illnesses present. 21 (ii) Upon immediate receipt of such recommendation, the commissioner 22 shall provide a copy of such to the speaker of the assembly and the 23 temporary president of the senate. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08119-01-5